Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 1. Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 208 to 231.

Effect of violation of safety equipment statute as establishing negligence in automobile accident litigation, 38 ALR3d 530.

Validity and construction of safety standards issued under National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966, as amended (15 USC § 1381 et seq.), 6 ALR Fed 988.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles § 38 to 40.

§ 31-5-901.
General requirements; applicability of provisions.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to drive or move or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this act, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this act, or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this act.

Nothing contained in this act shall prohibit equipment required by the United States Department of Transportation nor the use of additional parts and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of this act.

The provisions of W.S.

31-5-901

through

31-5-970

and regulations of the superintendent with respect to equipment required on vehicles shall not apply to vehicles moved solely by human power, motorcycles, autocycles, motor-driven cycles, mopeds, electric bicycles, multipurpose vehicles, off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II), implements of husbandry, highway construction machinery or farm tractors except as specifically made applicable.

A federal motor vehicle safety standard which conflicts with a provision of this act shall supersede that provision as to any vehicle in compliance with the federal standard. The highway department shall report any conflict to the legislature and the superintendent may adopt a regulation to replace the superseded provision.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 103; C.S. 1945, § 60-703; W.S. 1957, § 31-170; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2017 ch. 165, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (c).

The 2017 amendment,

in the middle of (c), added “autocycles.”

Laws 2017, ch. 165, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c), added "electric bicycles."

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added "off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II)" in (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a), (b) and (d), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).